District of Columbia statutes.
4-731

Repealed

Shelter in District buildings.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-204, § 2, 36 DCR 454
Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 32(c), 52 DCR 8113
1981 Ed., § 3-621.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-204, the “Frigid Temperature Protection Amendment Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-123, June 2, 1989.
Establishment—D.C. Hypothermia Procedures, see Mayor’s Order 2001-161, October 31, 2001 ( 48 DCR 10776).